Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1028.
do enact as follows:SB1028,11Section 1. 203.04 (2) (i) of the statutes is created to read:SB1028,2,32203.04 (2) (i) Charge a fee, as described in s. 203.01 (9) (a) 1., that exceeds the 3following:SB1028,2,541. For any advance of proceeds equal to or less than $75, $5, as adjusted under 5sub. (5).SB1028,2,762. For any advance of proceeds greater than $75, $7.50, as adjusted under sub. 7(5).SB1028,28Section 2. 203.04 (5) of the statutes is created to read:SB1028,2,149203.04 (5) Beginning on January 1, 2030, and at 5-year intervals thereafter, 10the division shall adjust the maximum fees specified in sub. (2) (i) to reflect changes 11since the effective date of this subsection .... [LRB inserts date], in the U.S. 12consumer price index for all urban consumers, U.S. city average, as determined by 13the U.S. department of labor. Each adjustment under this subsection shall be 14published on the department of financial institutions website.SB1028,315Section 3. 203.09 of the statutes is created to read:SB1028,3,216203.09 Applicability. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, ss. 17422.201 to 422.310, 422.404, 422.407, 422.414, 425.106 (1) (a), 426.201 to 426.203, 1766.555 to 766.565, and ch. 427 do not apply to earned wage access services offered 2and provided by a licensee in compliance with this chapter.SB1028,3,33